Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.170

Distribution of dividends.

The profits or net earnings of such association shall be distributed to those entitled thereto at such time and in such manner not inconsistent with this chapter as its bylaws shall prescribe, which shall be as often as once a year.

[ 1913 c 19 s 14; RRS s 3917. Formerly RCW 23.56.170.]